Mississippi, session 2026, SB2779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Legislative findings and purpose.  The Legislature finds that: (a)  The Mississippi Department of Corrections faces persistent challenges related to staffing shortages, elevated overtime costs, preventable medical emergencies, inmate and staff safety risks, and increased exposure to litigation and compliance actions; (b)  Traditional staffing-only approaches, while necessary, are costly, slow to deploy, and insufficient on their own to address systemic operational risk, particularly during overnight shifts and high-risk periods; (c)  Advances in data analytics and decision-support systems now permit correctional agencies to proactively identify health deterioration, behavioral risk escalation, staffing strain, and operational disruptions before they result in emergencies, assaults, suicides, or costly overtime responses; (d)  A limited pilot project will allow the State of Mississippi to evaluate whether such technology can act as a force multiplier for existing correctional staff, improve safety outcomes, reduce avoidable costs, and strengthen compliance and defensibility, without increasing headcount. It is therefore the purpose of this act to authorize a structured pilot program to test data-driven operational intelligence tools within the Mississippi Department of Corrections, subject to defined scope, oversight, and performance reporting. SECTION 2.  Authorization of pilot project.  (1)  The Mississippi Department of Corrections (MDOC) is authorized to establish and administer a pilot project in partnership with one or more qualified data analytics and decision-support vendors. (2)  The pilot project shall operate for a period of three (3) fiscal years, beginning July 1, 2026, unless terminated earlier by the Legislature. (3)  Participation in the pilot project shall not require the hiring of additional correctional officers or medical staff and shall be designed to support and augment existing personnel. SECTION 3.  Scope of work.  The pilot project shall include, at a minimum, the following capabilities and functions: (a)  Preventable medical emergency detection: (i)  Early identification of inmates at risk of preventable acute medical emergencies; (ii) Prioritization of interventions to reduce offsite emergency transports and hospitalizations; (iii)  Exclusion of suicide and self-harm events from medical cost calculations, which shall be tracked separately. (b)  Overtime and staffing efficiency analytics: (i)  Identification of patterns contributing to incident-driven overtime; (ii)  Support for shift-level and facility-level decision-making to reduce forced overtime and emergency staffing backfill; (iii)  Special emphasis on overnight and understaffed shifts. (c)  Medicare readiness and transition support: (i)  Identification of inmates eligible or near-eligible for Medicare or Medicare-coordinated coverage; (ii)  Support for administrative processes that reduce MDOC's medical cost burden through lawful coverage transitions. (d)  Operational strain reduction: (i)  Monitoring and analysis of system-wide disruptions, including lockdowns, emergency reassignments, transport churn, and cascading administrative workload; (ii)  Distinction between overtime costs and broader operational strain impacts. (e)  Safety and risk reduction: (i)  Identification of behavioral and environmental indicators associated with assaults, suicides, and severe self-harm; (ii)  Support for early intervention strategies aimed at reducing high-severity incidents. (f)  Compliance and litigation risk management: (i)  Enhanced documentation, defensibility, and reporting related to health care delivery, incident response, and institutional conditions; (ii)  Reduction of exposure to litigation, regulatory action, and federal intervention. SECTION 4.  Data governance and privacy.  (1)  All inmate and staff data used in the pilot project shall remain the property of the State of Mississippi. (2)  Any vendor participating in the pilot project shall comply with all applicable state and federal privacy, security, and data-use requirements, including, but not limited to, HIPAA where applicable. (3)  No personally identifiable data may be sold, transferred, or used for purposes unrelated to the pilot project. SECTION 5.  Performance measurement and reporting.  MDOC shall submit annual reports to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Corrections Committees, the Chairmen of the Appropriations Committees, and the Legislative Budget Office, which shall include: (a)  Quantified reductions in: (i)  Preventable medical emergencies; (ii)  Emergency medical transports; (iii)  Incident-driven overtime hours; (iv)  Assaults, suicides, and severe self-harm events; (b)  Estimated cost savings attributable to the pilot project, including: (i)  Medical cost avoidance; (ii)  Overtime reduction; (iii)  Operational strain reduction; (iv)  Medicare coverage transitions; (v)  Compliance and litigation risk mitigation; (c)  A composite risk and efficiency assessment measuring changes in: (i)  Inmate safety; (ii)  Staff safety and fatigue; (iii)  Operational strain; (iv)  Health escalation frequency; (v)  Legal and compliance exposure; (d)  An evaluation of whether the pilot project should be: (i)  Expanded statewide; (ii)  Modified; or (iii)  Discontinued upon completion of the pilot term. SECTION 6.  Construction and limitation.  Nothing in this act shall be construed to: (a)  Mandate the permanent procurement of any specific technology; (b)  Replace correctional officers or medical staff; (c)  Supersede existing statutory duties of MDOC. This act authorizes a pilot project only. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.